New Jersey, session 221, A2547.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1954, c.6, s.9 (C.5:8-32), or any other law to the contrary, an educational organization registered to hold and operate bingo games in accordance with the Bingo Licensing Law, P.L.1954, c.6 (C.5:8-24 et seq.), may operate bingo games, exclusively with students affiliated with the organization as participants, including persons under the age of 18 years old, only if prizes are awarded with the total value not to exceed $100 in all games played in a single occasion, in accordance with all other provisions of the Bingo Licensing Law.  A parent or guardian of a student under the age of 18 years old is required to consent in writing to that student participating in bingo games under this act, P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). As part of the operation of the bingo games described in this act, P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), an educational organization may charge a parent or other guardian for that students participation. The Legalized Games of Chance Control Commission shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act, P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), including when students are affiliated with an organization. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.